Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.005

Intent.

This chapter is intended to safeguard the household user of uninspected and inspected meat products from possible harm due to adulterated, misbranded, or unfit meat or meat products or meat or meat products that have been prepared under insanitary conditions.

[ 2000 c 99 s 1.]